Washington statutes.
RCW 36.115.050

Matters included.

A service agreement may include, but is not limited to, any or all of the following matters:

(1) A dispute resolution arrangement;

(2) How joint land-use planning and development regulations by the county and a city or cities, or by two or more cities, may be established, made binding, and enforced;

(3) How common development standards between the county and a city or cities, or between two or more cities, may be established, made binding, and enforced;

(4) How capital improvement plans of the county, cities, and special districts shall be coordinated;

(5) How plans and policies adopted under chapter 36.70A RCW will be implemented by the service agreement;

(6) A transfer of revenues between local governments in relationship to their obligations for providing governmental services;

(7) The designation of additional area-wide governmental services to be provided by the county.

[ 1994 c 266 s 5.]